California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(2) The commission shall consult with the office regarding the programs and activities in the plan in rendering its decision pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). The commission’s decision shall constitute approval of the revenue requirement necessary to implement the electrical corporation’s wildfire mitigation plan.

(3) Within 45 days of the commission’s decision rendered pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or any commission
 order modifying that decision, the electrical corporation shall submit a revised wildfire mitigation plan to the office that conforms to the commission’s revenue authorization. The office shall review and either approve or request modifications to the revised wildfire mitigation plan submitted in accordance with the revenue authorized pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). The office shall approve the revised wildfire mitigation plan within two months of submission. After approval by the office, the electrical corporation shall file the approved revised wildfire mitigation plan as an information-only submittal with the commission.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as a restriction or limitation on Article 1 (commencing with Section 451) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 57.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8386.5.

The commission, the office, and the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall enter into a memorandum of understanding to cooperatively develop consistent approaches and share data related to fire prevention, safety, vegetation management, and energy distribution systems. The commission, the office, and the department shall share results from various fire prevention activities, including relevant inspections and fire ignition data.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 58.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8386.6.

(a) All electrical line clearance tree trimmers performing work to comply with the vegetation management requirements in an electrical corporation’s wildfire mitigation plan shall be qualified line clearance tree trimmers, or trainees under the direct supervision and instruction of qualified line clearance tree trimmers, as provided in the High-Voltage Electrical Safety Orders (Group 2 (commencing with Section 2700) of Subchapter 5 of Chapter 4 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations) of the Department of Industrial Relations.

(b) All qualified line clearance tree trimmers shall be paid no less than the prevailing wage rate for a first period apprentice electrical utility lineman as determined by the Director of Industrial
 Relations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 406, Sec. 2.   (SB 247)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8386.10.

(a) The commission shall not allow a large electrical corporation to include in its equity rate base its share, as determined pursuant to the allocation specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3299.3, of the six billion dollars ($6,000,000,000) that the large electrical corporations collectively first expend on fire risk mitigation capital expenditures approved by the commission on or after January 1, 2026. These amounts are in addition to the amounts the large electrical corporations shall not include in their equity rate base pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 8386.3. An electrical corporation’s share of the fire risk mitigation capital expenditures and the debt financing costs of these fire risk mitigation capital expenditures may be financed through a financing order pursuant to Section 850.1, subject to the requirements of that financing order.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to an expenditure made after December 31,
 2035.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 81, Sec. 8.   (SB 168)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8387.

(a) Each local publicly owned electric utility and electrical cooperative shall construct, maintain, and operate its electrical lines and equipment in a manner that will minimize the risk of wildfire posed by those electrical lines and equipment.

(b) (1) The local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative shall, before January 1, 2020, prepare a wildfire mitigation plan. After January 1, 2026, a local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative shall prepare a wildfire mitigation plan and shall submit the plan to the California Wildfire Safety Advisory Board at least once every four years on a schedule determined by the California Wildfire Safety Advisory Board.

(2) The wildfire mitigation plan shall consider as necessary, at minimum, all of the following:

(A) An accounting of the responsibilities of persons responsible for executing the plan.

(B) The objectives of the wildfire mitigation plan.

(C) A description of the preventive strategies and programs to be adopted by the local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative to minimize the risk of its electrical lines and equipment causing catastrophic
 wildfires, including consideration of dynamic climate change risks.

(D) A description of the metrics the local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative plans to use to measure and track the implementation of the plan and the assumptions that underlie the use of those metrics.

(E) A discussion of how the application of previously identified metrics to previous wildfire mitigation plan performances has informed the wildfire mitigation plan.

(F) Protocols for disabling reclosers and deenergizing portions of the electrical distribution system that consider the associated impacts on public safety, and protocols related to mitigating the public safety impacts of those protocols, including impacts on critical first responders and on health and communication infrastructure.

(G) Appropriate and feasible procedures for notifying a customer who may be impacted by the deenergizing of electrical lines. The procedures shall direct notification to all public safety offices, critical first responders, health care facilities, and operators of telecommunications infrastructure with premises within the footprint of potential deenergization for a given event.

(H) Plans for vegetation management.

(I) Plans for inspections of the local publicly owned
 electric utility’s or electrical cooperative’s electrical infrastructure.

(J) A list that identifies, describes, and prioritizes all wildfire risks, and drivers for those risks, throughout the local publicly owned electric utility’s or electrical cooperative’s service territory. The list shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(i) Risks and risk drivers associated with design, construction, operation, and maintenance of the local publicly owned electric utility’s or electrical cooperative’s equipment and facilities.

(ii) Particular risks and risk drivers associated with topographic and climatological risk factors throughout the different parts of the local publicly owned electric utility’s or electrical cooperative’s service territory.

(K) Identification of any geographic area in the local publicly owned electric utility’s or electrical cooperative’s service territory that is a higher wildfire threat than is identified in a commission fire threat map, and identification of where the commission should expand a high fire-threat district based on new information or changes to the environment.

(L) A methodology for identifying and presenting enterprisewide safety risk and wildfire-related risk.

(M) A statement of how the local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative will restore service after a wildfire.

(N) A description of the processes and procedures the local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative shall use to do all of the following:

(i) Monitor and audit the implementation of the wildfire mitigation plan.

(ii) Identify any deficiencies in the wildfire mitigation plan or its implementation, and correct those deficiencies.

(iii) Monitor and audit the effectiveness of electrical line and equipment inspections, including inspections performed by contractors, that are carried out under the plan, other applicable statutes, or commission rules.

(3) In each year it is required to submit a plan, the local publicly owned electric utility
 or electrical cooperative shall present its wildfire mitigation plan in an appropriately noticed public meeting. The local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative shall accept comments on its wildfire mitigation plan from the public, other local and state agencies, and interested parties, and shall verify that the wildfire mitigation plan complies with all applicable rules, regulations, and standards, as appropriate.

(c) The local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative shall contract with a qualified independent evaluator with experience in assessing the safe operation of electrical infrastructure to review and assess the comprehensiveness of its wildfire mitigation plan. The independent evaluator shall issue a report that shall be made available on the internet website of the local publicly owned electric utility or electrical cooperative, and shall present the report at a public
 meeting of the local publicly owned electric utility’s or electrical cooperative’s governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 60.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8388.

(a) An electrical corporation, local publicly owned electric utility, or community choice aggregator with a contract to procure electricity generated from biomass pursuant to Section 399.20.3, commission Resolution E-4770 (March 17, 2016), or commission Resolution E-4805 (October 13, 2016), that expires on or before December 31, 2028, shall seek to amend the contract to include, or seek approval for a new contract that includes, an expiration date at least five years later than the expiration date in the contract that was operative in 2022 if the contract extension follows the feedstock requirement of subdivision (b) of Section 399.20.3.

(b) (1) Except as
 provided in paragraph (2), subdivision (a) does not apply to a facility located in a federal severe or extreme nonattainment area for particulate matter or ozone.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), subdivision (a) applies to a facility in an area that voluntarily opts for severe or extreme nonattainment status but the air district has determined that the continued operation of the facility does not impede the air district’s ability to meet its applicable attainment deadline.

(3) A contract between an electrical corporation, local publicly owned electric utility, or community choice aggregator and a biomass generator that is located in the Sacramento federal ozone nonattainment area shall not be extended unless the biomass generator
 first obtains a letter or certificate from the air district with jurisdiction over the biomass generator that states that the Sacramento federal ozone nonattainment area voluntarily opted to be classified in one or more federal standards in a severe or extreme nonattainment zone and that the continued operation of the facility does not impede the air district’s ability to meet its applicable requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 575, Sec. 2.   (AB 2750)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8388.5.

(a) The commission shall establish an expedited utility distribution infrastructure undergrounding program consistent with this section.

(b) Only a large electrical corporation may participate in the program.

(c) In order to participate in the program, a large electrical corporation shall submit to the office a distribution infrastructure undergrounding plan that shall address or include, at minimum, all of the following components:

(1) A 10-year plan for undergrounding distribution infrastructure.

(2) Identification of the undergrounding projects that will be constructed
 as part of the program, including a means of prioritizing undergrounding projects based on wildfire risk reduction, public safety, cost efficiency, and reliability benefits. Only undergrounding projects located in tier 2 or 3 high fire-threat districts or rebuild areas may be considered and constructed as part of the program.

(3) Timelines for the completion of identified and prioritized undergrounding projects, and unit cost targets and mileage completion targets for each year covered by the plan.

(4) A comparison of undergrounding versus aboveground hardening of electrical infrastructure and wildfire mitigation for achieving comparable risk reduction, or any other alternative mitigation strategy, such as covered conductor and rapid earth fault current limiter devices, for those prioritized undergrounding projects, evaluating the scope, cost, extent, and risk reduction of each
 activity, separately and collectively, over the duration of the plan. The comparison shall emphasize risk reduction and include an analysis of the cost of each activity for reducing wildfire risk, separately and collectively, over the duration of the plan.

(5) A plan for utility and contractor workforce development.

(6) An evaluation of project costs, projected economic benefits over the life of the assets, and any cost containment assumptions, including the economies of scale necessary to reduce wildfire risk and mitigation costs and establish a sustainable supply chain.

(d) Upon a large electrical corporation submitting a plan to the office, the office shall do both of the following:

(1) Publish the plan for public comment.

(2) Within nine months, review and approve or deny the plan. The office may only approve the plan if the large electrical corporation has shown that the plan will substantially increase electrical reliability by reducing the use of public safety power shut off, enhanced powerline safety settings, deenergization events, and any other outage programs, and substantially reduce the risk of wildfire. Before approving the plan, the office may require the large electrical corporation to modify the plan or to modify and resubmit the plan.

(e) (1) Upon the office approving a plan pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), the large electrical corporation shall, within 60 days, submit to the commission a copy of the plan and an application requesting review and conditional approval of the plan’s costs and including all of the following:

(A) Any substantial improvements in safety risk and reduction in costs compared to other hardening and risk mitigation measures over the duration of the plan.

(B) The cost targets, at a minimum, that result in feasible and attainable cost reductions as compared to the large electrical corporation’s historical undergrounding costs.

(C) How the cost targets are expected to decline over time due to cost efficiencies and economies of scale.

(D) A strategy for achieving cost reductions over time.

(2) The assigned commissioner may waive the requirements of subdivisions (b), (d), (f), and (i) of Section 1701.3 for an application submitted to the commission pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) In reviewing an application submitted to the commission pursuant to paragraph (1), the commission shall consider not revisiting cost or mileage completion targets approved, or pending approval, in the electrical corporation’s general rate case or a commission-approved balancing account ratemaking mechanism for system hardening.

(4) Upon the commission receiving an application pursuant to paragraph (1), the commission shall facilitate a public workshop for presentation of the plan and take public comment for at least 30 days.

(5) On or before nine months, the commission shall review and approve or deny the application. Before approving the application, the commission may require the large electrical corporation to modify or modify and resubmit the application.

(6) The commission shall consider
 continuing an existing commission-approved balancing account ratemaking mechanism for system hardening for the duration of a plan, as determined by the commission, and shall authorize recovery of recorded costs that are determined to be just and reasonable.

(f) If the plan is approved by the office and commission, the large electrical corporation shall do all of the following:

(1) Every six months, file a progress report with the office and the commission. The large electrical corporation and the office shall publish these progress reports on their internet websites.

(2) Include ongoing work plans and progress in wildfire mitigation plan filings.

(3) Hire an independent monitor, selected by the office, to review and assess the large electrical corporation’s adherence to its plan and submit a report with the office each December 1 over the course of the plan.

(g) (1) In reviewing and assessing the large electrical corporation’s adherence to its plan pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (f), the independent monitor shall assess whether the large electrical corporation’s progress on undergrounding work has been consistent with the objectives identified in its plan. The independent monitor’s report shall specify any failure, delays, or shortcomings of the large electrical corporation and provide recommendations for improvements to accomplish the objectives set forth in the plan.

(2) The large electrical corporation shall have 180 days to correct and eliminate any deficiency specified in the independent monitor’s report.

(3) On or before December 1 of each year the plan is in effect, the independent monitor shall submit the
 report to the office.

(h) The office shall publish reports received pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) on its internet website.

(i) (1) The office shall consider the independent monitor’s report and whether the large electrical corporation has cured any deficiencies, and may provide an assessment to the commission for consideration.

(2) The commission may assess penalties on a large electrical corporation that fails to comply with a commission decision approving its plan.

(j) Each large electrical corporation participating in the program shall apply for available federal, state, and other nonratepayer moneys throughout the duration of its approved undergrounding plan, and any moneys received as a result of those applications shall be used to reduce the program’s costs on the large electrical corporation’s ratepayers.

(k) An approval of a plan pursuant to this section is not a project as defined in Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code, provided that environmental review otherwise required by Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code occurs before any project approval that would
 authorize physical changes being made to the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 61.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8389.

(a) The Director of the Office of Energy Infrastructure Safety shall issue a certificate to an electrical corporation if the electrical corporation provides documentation of the following:

(1) The electrical corporation has an approved wildfire mitigation plan pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8386.3.

(2) The electrical corporation has agreed to implement the recommendations of its most recent safety culture assessments performed pursuant to Section 8386.2, if applicable.

(3) The electrical corporation has established a safety committee of its board of directors composed of members with relevant safety experience.

(4) The electrical corporation has established an executive incentive compensation structure approved by the office and structured to promote safety as a priority and to ensure public safety and utility financial stability with performance metrics, including incentive compensation based on meeting performance metrics that are measurable and enforceable, for all executive officers, as defined in Section 451.5. This may include tying 100 percent of incentive compensation to safety performance and denying all incentive compensation in the event the electrical corporation causes a catastrophic wildfire that results in one or more fatalities.

(5) The electrical corporation has established board-of-director-level reporting to the commission and office on safety issues.

(6) (A) The electrical corporation
 has established a compensation structure for any new or amended contracts, plans, or arrangements, whether written or unwritten, for executive officers, as defined in Section 451.5, that is based on the following principles:

(i) (I) Strict limits on guaranteed cash compensation, with the primary portion of the executive officers’ compensation based on achievement of objective performance metrics.

(II) No guaranteed monetary incentives in the compensation structure.

(ii) It satisfies the compensation principles identified in paragraph (4).

(iii) A long-term structure that provides a significant portion of compensation, which
 may take the form of grants of the electrical corporation’s stock, based on the electrical corporation’s long-term performance and value. This compensation shall be held or deferred for a period of at least three years.

(iv) Minimization or elimination of indirect or ancillary compensation that is not aligned with shareholder and taxpayer interest in the electrical corporation.

(B) The office shall approve the compensation structure of an electrical corporation if it determines the structure meets the principles set forth in subparagraph (A) and paragraph (4).

(C) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this paragraph and paragraph (4), that any approved bankruptcy reorganization plan of an electrical corporation should, in regards to compensation for executive officers of the electrical corporation, comply with the requirements of those paragraphs.

(7) The electrical corporation is implementing the mitigation strategies in its approved wildfire mitigation plan. The electrical
 corporation shall file a notification of implementation of its wildfire mitigation plan with the office and an information-only submittal with the commission on a quarterly basis that details the implementation of both its approved wildfire mitigation plan and recommendations of the most recent safety culture assessments by the commission and office, and a statement of the recommendations of the board of directors safety committee meetings that occurred during the quarter. The notification and information-only submittal shall also summarize the implementation of the safety committee recommendations from the electrical corporation’s previous notification and submission. If the office has reason to doubt the veracity of the statements contained in the notification or information-only submittal, it shall perform an audit of the issue of concern. The electrical corporation shall provide a copy of the information-only submittal to the office.

(b) (1) A certificate shall be valid for the 12 consecutive months following the issuance of the certificate.

(2) (A) Before the expiration of a certificate, an electrical corporation shall submit to the office a request for a certificate for the following 12 months. The office shall issue a certificate within 90 days of a request if the electrical corporation has provided documentation that it has satisfied the requirements in subdivision (a).

(B) The office may, for good cause, in writing, extend the 90-day period.

(3) All documents submitted pursuant to this section shall be publicly available on the commission’s and the office’s internet websites.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a certificate shall remain valid until the office acts on the electrical corporation’s pending request for a certificate.

(B) The office may extend the expiration date of a certificate if the office or the commission has not yet acted on an element of the certificate request required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 62.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Designated Water System Administration [8390. - 8390.]

8390.

A privately owned public utility may serve as an administrator for purposes of Section 116686 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 120, Sec. 10.   (SB 200)   Effective July 24, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Electrical, Gas, Sewer, and Water Service for New Housing Construction [8400. - 8401.]

8400.

As used in this chapter, “utility” means any of the following that furnish electrical, gas, water, or sewer service, or any combination thereof, where the service is performed for, or the commodity is delivered to, the public or any portion thereof:

(a) An electrical corporation, as defined in Section 218.

(b) A gas corporation, as defined in Section 222.

(c) A sewer system corporation, as defined in Section 230.6.

(d) A water corporation, as defined in Section 241.

(e) A municipality or municipal corporation
 operating as a public utility pursuant to Division 5 (commencing with Section 10001).

(f) A municipal utility district formed pursuant to the Municipal Utility District Act (Division 6 (commencing with Section 11501)).

(g) A public utility district formed pursuant to The Public Utility District Act (Division 7 (commencing with Section 15501)).

(h) An irrigation district formed pursuant to the Irrigation District Law (Division 11 (commencing with Section 20500) of the Water Code).

(i) A joint powers authority that includes one or more of the entities described in subdivisions (e) to (h), inclusive, and that owns electrical, gas, water, or sewer facilities, or furnishes electrical, gas, water, or sewer service over its own or its member’s
 system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 787, Sec. 1.   (SB 1210)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8401.

(a) On or before January 1, 2026, for new housing construction, each utility shall publicly post both of the following on its internet website:

(1) A schedule of estimated fees for typical service connections for each housing development type, including, but not limited to, accessory dwelling unit, multifamily, mixed-use, and single-family developments. This paragraph does not apply to a utility that continues to post a schedule of their fees with this information pursuant to Section 65940.1 of the Government Code.

(2) The estimated timeframes for completing typical service connections needed for each housing development type, including, but not limited to, accessory dwelling unit,
 mixed-use, multifamily, and single-family developments.

(b) (1) This section does not apply to a utility with fewer than 4,000 service connections that does not establish or maintain an internet website due to a hardship.

(2) The utility may establish that a hardship exists by annually adopting a resolution that includes detailed findings based on evidence that is publicly noticed before the meeting and included in the meeting agenda that supports the determination that a hardship prevents the utility from establishing or maintaining an internet website. The findings may include, but shall not be limited to, inadequate access to broadband communications network facilities that enable high-speed internet access, significantly limited financial resources, or insufficient staff resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 787, Sec. 1.   (SB 1210)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Information Sharing [8410. - 8412.]

8410.

For purposes of this chapter, all of the following definitions apply:

(a) “Electrical corporation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 218.

(b) “Local publicly owned
 electric utility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 224.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 709, Sec. 1.   (AB 777)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8411.

(a) (1) The commission, as it deems necessary for the exchange of aggregated data, may establish any memoranda of understanding or other agreements necessary to direct
 electrical corporations to timely provide data to the State Department of Social Services to maximize the food assistance available pursuant to Section 18917.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) The data provided pursuant to the
 memoranda of understanding or other agreements shall meet, at minimum, all of the following requirements and prohibitions:

(A) The provided data shall be limited to only the aggregated customer outage data at the ZIP Code level that is necessary
 for the State Department of Social Services
 to maximize food assistance in an emergency, and shall not include any personally identifiable information.

(B) The provided data shall not be used for any purposes other than those specified in this section and Section 18917.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(C) The provided data shall be subject to all applicable privacy laws.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, or the execution of any memoranda of understanding or other agreements, each electrical corporation
 shall, within seven calendar days, make a reasonable effort to provide aggregated customer outage data, for outages of four hours or longer, in response to a request for data by the State Department of Social Services in order to maximize the food assistance available pursuant to Section 18917.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) Data provided to the State Department of Social Services shall meet, at minimum, all of the following requirements and prohibitions:

(A) The provided data shall be limited to only the aggregated customer outage data at the ZIP Code level that is necessary for the State Department of Social Services to maximize food
 assistance in an emergency, and shall not include any personally identifiable information.

(B) The provided data shall include, but not be limited to, the dates of power outages, duration in hours of power outages, the counties affected by power outages, the ZIP Codes affected by power outages, and, for each affected ZIP Code, the total number of residential customers in the ZIP Code and the total number of residential customers who lost electrical service during the power outages.

(C) The provided data shall not be used for any purposes other than those specified in this section and Section 18917.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(D) The provided data shall be subject to all applicable privacy laws.

(c) Each
 electrical corporation shall have a dedicated point of contact for the State Department of Social Services necessary to provide the data requested pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) The commission shall provide technical assistance to the State Department of Social Services, including, but not limited to, technical assistance to support the report described in Section 18917.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 709, Sec. 1.   (AB 777)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8412.

(a) (1) The governing board of each local publicly owned electric utility, as it deems necessary for the exchange of aggregated data, may establish any memoranda of understanding or other agreements necessary to direct the local publicly owned electric utility to timely
 provide data to the State Department of Social Services to maximize the food assistance available pursuant to Section 18917.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) The data provided pursuant to the memoranda of understanding or other
 agreements shall meet, at minimum, all of the following requirements and prohibitions:

(A) The provided data shall be limited to only the aggregated customer outage data at the ZIP Code level that is necessary for the State Department of Social Services to maximize food assistance in an emergency, and shall not
 include any personally identifiable information.

(B) The provided data shall not be used for any purposes other than those specified in this section and Section 18917.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(C) The provided data shall be subject to all applicable privacy laws.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law or the execution of any memoranda of understanding or other agreements, each local publicly owned electric utility
 shall, within seven calendar days, make a reasonable effort to provide aggregated customer outage data, for outages of four hours or longer, in response to a request for data by the State Department of Social Services in order to maximize the food assistance available pursuant to Section 18917.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) Data provided to the State Department of Social Services shall meet, at minimum, all of the following requirements and prohibitions:

(A) The provided data shall be limited to only the aggregated customer outage data at the ZIP Code level that is necessary for the State Department of Social Services to maximize food assistance in an emergency, and shall not include any personally identifiable information.

(B) The provided data shall include, but not be limited to, the dates of power outages, duration in hours of power outages, the counties affected by power outages, the ZIP Codes affected by power outages, and, for each affected ZIP Code, the total number of residential customers in the ZIP Code and the total number of residential customers who lost electrical service during power outages.

(C) The provided data shall not be used for any purposes other than those specified in this section and Section 18917.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(D) The provided data shall be subject to all applicable privacy laws.

(c) Each local publicly owned electric utility shall
 designate a point of contact for the State Department of Social Services
 necessary to provide the data requested pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) The State Department of Social Services shall notify each local publicly owned electric utility of any changes to the federal requirements in a timely manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 709, Sec. 1.   (AB 777)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Energy Storage Systems [8500. - 8504.]

8500.

For purposes of this chapter, both of the following definitions apply:

(a) “Energy storage system” means a stationary electrical energy storage system, as defined in Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1201) of Part 9 of the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), that is capable of storing 10 megawatthours or more of energy.

(b) “Local jurisdiction” means a city, county, or city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   (SB 283)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8501.

An application submitted to a local jurisdiction for an energy storage system shall include the applicant’s certification that, 

 at least 30 days before submitting the application, the applicant met and conferred with the authority that has jurisdiction over fire suppression in the area where the energy storage system is proposed and discussed the energy storage system design, sought input on mitigating potential fire and life safety concerns, and sought input on the content of emergency action plans required by Section 761.3 of the Public Utilities Code. The application shall include documentation of this consultation, including the date, the names and titles of participants, a summary of fire safety matters discussed, and a description of how the application addresses those
 matters.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   (SB 283)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8502.

For any application submitted after January 1, 2026, a local jurisdiction shall not approve an energy storage system, unless the local jurisdiction requires, as a condition of 

 approval, that after installation is complete, but before commencing operations or use of the batteries, the energy storage system is inspected by the respective authorities having jurisdiction, including the authority that has jurisdiction over fire suppression. The applicant shall bear the cost of the inspections. The inspector shall be provided a copy of the documentation of the initial fire official consultation submitted with the application pursuant to Section 8501.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   (SB 283)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8503.

(a) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Dedicated-use building” has the same meaning as defined in the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).

(2) “Noncombustible building” means a building that meets the Type I building requirements set forth in the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).

(3) “Outdoor installation” means an energy storage system that is regulated by the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).

(b) As part of the next update to the California Building Standards Code considered after July 1, 2026, the Office of the State Fire Marshal shall review and consider proposing provisions that restrict the location of energy storage systems to dedicated-use noncombustible buildings or outdoor installations.

(c) (1) In the review and consideration of limiting the use of indoor installations of energy storage systems pursuant to subdivision (b), the Office of the State Fire Marshal shall consider proposing provisions that are consistent with the efforts of the office to ensure the safe construction, installation, commission, operation, maintenance, and decommission of energy storage systems.

(2) The provisions considered pursuant to paragraph (1) shall only pertain to fire and life safety considered
 in the California Building Standards Code development process and shall not limit the commission’s general oversight of energy storage systems.

(d) As part of the review pursuant to subdivision (b), the State Fire Marshal may consider different requirements for battery technologies with different flammability and risk profiles.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   (SB 283)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8504.

This chapter does not prevent a local jurisdiction from adopting and enforcing laws consistent with or more protective than this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   (SB 283)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 15. Customer Communications [8550. - 8550.]

8550.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), each utility shall, on or before March 1, 2026, automatically enroll its customers in alerts for service outages and updates.

(b) (1) A local publicly owned electric utility that does not have the necessary system to implement the requirements of subdivision (a) shall, on or before March 1, 2026, develop appropriate and feasible procedures to maximize the automatic enrollment of its customers in
 alerts for electrical service outages and updates.
